Utah statutes.
59-10-114.   Additions to and subtractions from adjusted gross income of an
individual.
(1)  There shall be added to adjusted gross income of a resident or
nonresident individual:
(a)  a lump sum distribution that the taxpayer does not include in adjusted
gross income on the taxpayer's federal individual income tax return for the
taxable year;
(b) the amount of a child's income calculated under Subsection (4) that:
(i)  a parent elects to report on the parent's federal individual income tax
return for the taxable year; and
(ii)  the parent does not include in adjusted gross income on the parent's
federal individual income tax return for the taxable year;
(c) (i)  a withdrawal from a medical care savings account and any penalty
imposed for the taxable year if:
(A)  the resident or nonresident individual does not deduct the amounts on the
resident or nonresident individual's federal individual income tax return
under Section 220, Internal Revenue Code;
(B)  the withdrawal is subject to Subsections 31A-32a-105(1) and (2); and
(C)  the withdrawal is:
(I)  subtracted on a return the resident or nonresident individual files under
this chapter for a taxable year beginning on or before December 31, 2007; or
(II)  used as the basis for a resident or nonresident individual to claim a
tax credit under Section 59-10-1021;
(ii)  a disbursement required to be added to adjusted gross income in
accordance with Subsection 31A-32a-105(3); or
(iii)  an amount required to be added to adjusted gross income in accordance
with Subsection 31A-32a-105(5)(c);
(d)  the amount withdrawn under Title 53B, Chapter 8a, Utah Educational
Savings Plan, from the account of a resident or nonresident individual who is
an account owner as defined in Section 53B-8a-102, for the taxable year for
which the amount is withdrawn, if that amount withdrawn from the account of
the resident or nonresident individual who is the account owner:
(i)  is not expended for:
(A)  higher education costs as defined in Section 53B-8a-102; or
(B)  a payment or distribution that qualifies as an exception to the
additional tax for distributions not used for educational expenses provided in
Sections 529(c) and 530(d), Internal Revenue Code; and
(ii)  is:
(A)  subtracted by the resident or nonresident individual:
(I)  who is the account owner; and
(II)  on the resident or nonresident individual's return filed under this
chapter for a taxable year beginning on or before December 31, 2007; or
(B)  used as the basis for the resident or nonresident individual who is the
account owner to claim a tax credit under Section 59-10-1017;
(e)  except as provided in Subsection (5), for bonds, notes, and other
evidences of indebtedness acquired on or after January 1, 2003, the interest
from bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness issued by one or more
of the following entities:
(i)  a state other than this state;
(ii)  the District of Columbia;
(iii)  a political subdivision of a state other than this state; or
(iv)  an agency or instrumentality of an entity described in Subsections
(1)(e)(i) through (iii);
(f)  subject to Subsection (2)(c), any distribution received by a resident
beneficiary of a resident trust of income that was taxed at the trust level
for federal tax purposes, but was subtracted from state taxable income of the
trust pursuant to Subsection 59-10-202(2)(b);
(g)  any distribution received by a resident beneficiary of a nonresident
trust of undistributed distributable net income realized by the trust on or
after January 1, 2004, if that undistributed distributable net income was
taxed at the trust level for federal tax purposes, but was not taxed at the
trust level by any state, with undistributed distributable net income
considered to be distributed from the most recently accumulated undistributed
distributable net income; and
(h)  any adoption expense:
(i)  for which a resident or nonresident individual receives reimbursement
from another person; and
(ii)  to the extent to which the resident or nonresident individual subtracts
that adoption expense:
(A)  on a return filed under this chapter for a taxable year beginning on or
before December 31, 2007; or
(B)  from federal taxable income on a federal individual income tax return.
(2)  There shall be subtracted from adjusted gross income of a resident or
nonresident individual:
(a)  the difference between:
(i)  the interest or a dividend on an obligation or security of the United
States or an authority, commission, instrumentality, or possession of the
United States, to the extent that interest or dividend is:
(A)  included in adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes for the
taxable year; and
(B)  exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the United States; and
(ii)  any interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry
the obligation or security described in Subsection (2)(a)(i);
(b)  for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, if the
conditions of Subsection (3)(a) are met, the amount of income derived by a Ute
tribal member:
(i)  during a time period that the Ute tribal member resides on homesteaded
land diminished from the Uintah and Ouray Reservation; and
(ii)  from a source within the Uintah and Ouray Reservation;
(c)  an amount received by a resident or nonresident individual or
distribution received by a resident or nonresident beneficiary of a resident
trust:
(i)  if that amount or distribution constitutes a refund of taxes imposed by:
(A)  a state; or
(B)  the District of Columbia; and
(ii)  to the extent that amount or distribution is included in adjusted gross
income for that taxable year on the federal individual income tax return of
the resident or nonresident individual or resident or nonresident beneficiary
of a resident trust;
(d)  the amount of a railroad retirement benefit:
(i)  paid:
(A)  in accordance with The Railroad Retirement Act of 1974, 45 U.S.C. Sec.
231 et seq.;
(B)  to a resident or nonresident individual; and
(C)  for the taxable year; and
(ii)  to the extent that railroad retirement benefit is included in adjusted
gross income on that resident or nonresident individual's federal individual
income tax return for that taxable year; and
(e)  an amount:
(i)  received by an enrolled member of an American Indian tribe; and
(ii)  to the extent that the state is not authorized or permitted to impose a
tax under this part on that amount in accordance with:
(A)  federal law;
(B)  a treaty; or
(C)  a final decision issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3) (a)  A subtraction for an amount described in Subsection (2)(b) is allowed
only if:
(i)  the taxpayer is a Ute tribal member; and
(ii)  the governor and the Ute tribe execute and maintain an agreement meeting
the requirements of this Subsection (3).
(b)  The agreement described in Subsection (3)(a):
(i)  may not:
(A)  authorize the state to impose a tax in addition to a tax imposed under
this chapter;
(B)  provide a subtraction under this section greater than or different from
the subtraction described in Subsection (2)(b); or
(C)  affect the power of the state to establish rates of taxation; and
(ii)  shall:
(A)  provide for the implementation of the subtraction described in Subsection
(2)(b);
(B)  be in writing;
(C)  be signed by:
(I)  the governor; and
(II)  the chair of the Business Committee of the Ute tribe;
(D)  be conditioned on obtaining any approval required by federal law; and
(E)  state the effective date of the agreement.
(c) (i)  The governor shall report to the commission by no later than February
1 of each year regarding whether or not an agreement meeting the requirements
of this Subsection (3) is in effect.
(ii)  If an agreement meeting the requirements of this Subsection (3) is
terminated, the subtraction permitted under Subsection (2)(b) is not allowed
for taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 following the
termination of the agreement.
(d)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(b) and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules:
(i)  for determining whether income is derived from a source within the Uintah
and Ouray Reservation; and
(ii)  that are substantially similar to how adjusted gross income derived from
Utah sources is determined under Section 59-10-117.
(4) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (4), "Form 8814" means:
(i)  the federal individual income tax Form 8814, Parents' Election To Report
Child's Interest and Dividends; or
(ii) (A) a form designated by the commission in accordance with Subsection
(4)(a)(ii)(B) as being substantially similar to 2000 Form 8814 if for purposes
of federal individual income taxes the information contained on 2000 Form 8814
is reported on a form other than Form 8814; and
(B)  for purposes of Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(A) and in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may make
rules designating a form as being substantially similar to 2000 Form 8814 if
for purposes of federal individual income taxes the information contained on
2000 Form 8814 is reported on a form other than Form 8814.
(b)  The amount of a child's income added to adjusted gross income under
Subsection (1)(b) is equal to the difference between:
(i)  the lesser of:
(A)  the base amount specified on Form 8814; and
(B)  the sum of the following reported on Form 8814:
(I)  the child's taxable interest;
(II)  the child's ordinary dividends; and
(III)  the child's capital gain distributions; and
(ii)  the amount not taxed that is specified on Form 8814.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(e), interest from bonds, notes, and other
evidences of indebtedness issued by an entity described in Subsections
(1)(e)(i) through (iv) may not be added to adjusted gross income of a resident
or nonresident individual if, as annually determined by the commission:
(a)  for an entity described in Subsection (1)(e)(i) or (ii), the entity and
all of the political subdivisions, agencies, or instrumentalities of the
entity do not impose a tax based on income on any part of the bonds, notes,
and other evidences of indebtedness of this state; or
(b)  for an entity described in Subsection (1)(e)(iii) or (iv), the following
do not impose a tax based on income on any part of the bonds, notes, and other
evidences of indebtedness of this state:
(i)  the entity; or
(ii) (A)  the state in which the entity is located; or
(B)  the District of Columbia, if the entity is located within the District of
Columbia.
